Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2741.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. This Act shall be entitled the “The Electricity Bill Transparency Act,” and
shall be construed in a manner to achieve its public purpose, which is to ensure that affordable
electric service be available to all consumers on reasonable terms and conditions.
SECTION 2. Chapter 169 of the acts of 2008 is hereby amended by inserting after section
116, the following new sections:-
“Section 116A. The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall annually
report the estimated or actual ratepayer cost and benefits of each program and policy required
under chapter 169 of the acts of 2008 to the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and
energy. Said report shall be submitted to the committee no later than January 31 of each year.
Whenever possible, the reported costs shall be presented on a volumetric percentage of
electricity supplied from renewable resources to each end user customer class.
of 3

Section 116B. All information reported by the executive office of energy and
environmental affairs as required under section 116A of this act shall be made available as a
public record and posted to the department of energy resources website simultaneously with
submittal to the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and energy.
Section 116C. All actual ratepayer costs of each program and policy required under
chapter 169 of the acts of 2008 shall be itemized on each end user’s electric utility bill.”
SECTION 3. Chapter 179 of the acts of 2022 is hereby amended by inserting after section
91, the following new sections:-
“Section 91A. The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall annually
report the estimated or actual ratepayer cost and benefits of each program and policy required
under chapter 179 of the acts of 2022 to the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and
energy. Said report shall be submitted to the committee no later than January 31 of each year.
Whenever possible, the reported costs shall be presented on a volumetric percentage of
electricity supplied from renewable resources to each end user customer class.
Section 91B. All information reported by the executive office of energy and
environmental affairs as required under section 91A of this act shall be made available as a
public record and posted to the department of energy resources website simultaneously with
submittal to the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and energy.
Section 91C. All actual ratepayer costs of each program and policy required under
chapter 179 of the acts of 2022 shall be itemized on each end user’s electric utility bill.”
of 3

SECTION 4. Chapter 239 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by inserting after section
136, the following new sections:-
“Section 136A. The executive office of energy and environmental affairs shall annually
report the estimated or actual ratepayer cost and benefits of each program and policy required
under chapter 239 of the acts of 2024 to the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and
energy. Said report shall be submitted to the committee no later than January 31 of each year.
Whenever possible, the reported costs shall be presented on a volumetric percentage of
electricity supplied from renewable resources to each end user customer class.
Section 136B. All information reported by the executive office of energy and
environmental affairs as required under section 136A of this act shall be made available as a
public record and posted to the department of energy resources website simultaneously with
submittal to the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and energy.
Section 116C. All actual ratepayer costs of each program and policy required under
chapter 239 of the acts of 2024 shall be itemized on each end user’s electric utility bill.”
SECTION 5. The department of public utilities shall promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 6. The department of energy resources shall promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 7. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3